Wisconsin, session 2025, AB598.
do enact as follows:AB598,11Section 1. 50.06 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 50.06 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB598,2,3350.06 (1) (intro.) In this section, “incapacitated”:AB598,2,74(c) “Incapacitated” means unable to receive and evaluate information 5effectively or to communicate decisions to such an extent that the individual lacks 6the capacity to manage his or her health care decisions, including decisions about 7his or her post-hospital care.AB598,28Section 2. 50.06 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,2,9950.06 (1) (a) “Adult-at-risk agency” has the meaning given in s. 55.01 (1f).AB598,310Section 3. 50.06 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,3,2150.06 (1) (b) “Advanced practice clinician” has the meaning given in s. 155.01 2(1g).AB598,43Section 4. 50.06 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,3,6450.06 (1) (d) “Patient’s representative” means the individual described under 5sub. (3) who may consent to an admission of an incapacitated individual under sub. 6(2).AB598,57Section 5. 50.06 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB598,3,10850.06 (2) (b) The individual for whom admission is sought is not diagnosed as 9developmentally disabled or as having a mental illness, as defined in s. 51.01 (13) 10(a), at the time of the proposed admission.AB598,611Section 6. 50.06 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB598,3,151250.06 (2) (c) A Unless the incapacitated individual is admitted to a facility 13under sub. (8), a petition for guardianship for the individual under s. 54.34 and a 14petition under s. 55.075 for protective placement of the individual are filed prior to 15the proposed admission.AB598,716Section 7. 50.06 (4) of the statutes is renumbered 50.06 (4) (a) and amended 17to read:AB598,4,41850.06 (4) (a) A determination that an individual is incapacitated for purposes 19of sub. (2) shall be made by 2 physicians, as defined in s. 448.01 (5), or by one 20physician and one psychologist advanced practice clinician, who personally examine 21the individual and sign a statement specifying that the individual is incapacitated. 22Mere old age, eccentricity, or physical disability, either singly or together, are 23insufficient to make a finding that an individual is incapacitated. Neither of the 24individuals who make a finding that an individual is incapacitated may be a 1relative, as defined in s. 242.01 (11), of the individual or have knowledge that he or 2she is entitled to or has a claim on any portion of the individual’s estate. A copy of 3the statement shall be included in the individual’s records in the facility to which he 4or she is admitted.AB598,85Section 8. 50.06 (4) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,4,20650.06 (4) (b) A physician or advanced practice clinician who has determined 7that an individual is incapacitated for purposes of sub. (2) shall, if the individual is 8admitted to a facility under sub. (8), prepare a written statement on a form 9prescribed by the department stating that they personally examined the 10incapacitated individual, the date and location that the physician or advanced 11practice clinician determined the individual is incapacitated for purposes of sub. 12(2), the medical conditions of the individual, if any, that led the physician or 13advanced practice clinician to conclude that the individual is incapacitated, the 14physician’s or advanced practice clinician’s office address and contact information, 15and any other information identified by the department. A copy of the written 16statement shall be included in the incapacitated individual’s patient health care 17records and shall, within 72 hours following admission of the incapacitated 18individual to a facility under sub. (8), be sent to the corporation counsel for the 19county in which the incapacitated individual resides and the adult-at-risk agency 20for the county in which the incapacitated individual resides.AB598,921Section 9. 50.06 (4) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,5,112250.06 (4) (c) A physician or advanced practice clinician who determines that 23an individual is no longer incapacitated for purposes of sub. (8) (f) shall, if the 24individual was admitted as an incapacitated individual to a facility under sub. (8), 1prepare a written statement that they personally examined the individual, the date 2and location that the physician or advanced practice clinician determined the 3individual is no longer incapacitated for purposes of sub. (8) (f), the medical 4conditions of the individual, if any, that led the physician or advanced practice 5clinician to conclude that the individual is no longer incapacitated, the physician’s 6or advanced practice clinician’s office address and contact information, and any 7other information identified by the department. A copy of the written statement 8shall be included in the individual’s patient health care records and shall, within 72 9hours of a determination made under this paragraph, be sent to the corporation 10counsel for the county in which the individual resides and the adult-at-risk agency 11for the county in which the individual resides.AB598,1012Section 10. 50.06 (5) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB598,5,201350.06 (5) (a) (intro.) Except as otherwise provided in par. pars. (am) and (b), 14an individual who consents to an admission under this section a patient’s 15representative may, for the incapacitated individual, make health care decisions to 16the same extent as a guardian of the person may, enroll the incapacitated 17individual in the Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49 to the same 18extent as a guardian of the estate may, and authorize expenditures related to health 19care to the same extent as a guardian of the estate may, until the earliest of the 20following:AB598,1121Section 11. 50.06 (5) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,6,62250.06 (5) (am) Except as otherwise provided in pars. (ar) and (b), a patient’s 23representative may, for the incapacitated individual, make health care decisions to 24the same extent as a guardian of the person may, enroll the incapacitated 1individual in the Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49 to the same 2extent as a guardian of the estate may, and authorize expenditures related to health 3care to the same extent as a guardian of the estate may if the patient’s 4representative consents to admission for the incapacitated individual in the 5manner provided in sub. (8). Any authority of a patient’s representative under this 6paragraph ends if any of the following occurs:AB598,6,871. A court appoints a guardian to make such decisions for the incapacitated 8individual.AB598,6,992. The incapacitated individual is discharged to a setting that is not a facility.AB598,6,11103. A health care power of attorney that was not identified at the time that the 11patient’s representative was established is identified.AB598,6,13124. The incapacitated individual is determined to no longer be incapacitated as 13provided in sub. (8) (f).AB598,1214Section 12. 50.06 (5) (ar) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,6,171550.06 (5) (ar) No patient’s representative may consent to admission for an 16incapacitated individual in the manner provided in sub. (8) after the date that is 3 17years after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date].AB598,1318Section 13. 50.06 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB598,6,221950.06 (5) (b) An individual who consents to an admission under this section A 20patient’s representative may not authorize expenditures related to health care if the 21incapacitated individual has an agent under a durable power of attorney, as defined 22in s. 244.02 (3), who may authorize expenditures related to health care.AB598,1423Section 14. 50.06 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB598,7,6150.06 (6) If Unless the incapacitated individual was admitted to a facility 2under sub. (8), if the incapacitated individual is in the facility after 60 days after 3admission and a guardian has not been appointed, the authority of the person who 4consented to the admission patient’s representative to make decisions and, if sub. 5(5) (a) applies, to authorize expenditures is extended for 30 days for the purpose of 6allowing the facility to initiate discharge planning for the incapacitated individual.AB598,157Section 15. 50.06 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB598,7,16850.06 (7) An individual who consents to an admission under this section A 9patient’s representative may request a functional screening and a financial and 10cost-sharing screening to determine eligibility for the family care benefit under s. 1146.286 (1). If admission is sought on behalf of the incapacitated individual or if the 12incapacitated individual is about to be admitted on a private pay basis, the 13individual who consents to the admission patient’s representative may waive the 14requirement for a financial and cost-sharing screening under s. 46.283 (4) (g), 15unless the incapacitated individual is expected to become eligible for medical 16assistance within 6 months.AB598,1617Section 16. 50.06 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB598,7,211850.06 (8) (a) A patient’s representative may consent to an admission of an 19incapacitated individual under sub. (2) without a petition for guardianship or 20protective placement of the incapacitated individual being filed if all of the 21following apply:AB598,7,23221. The incapacitated individual is admitted directly from a hospital inpatient 23unit.AB598,8,912. The patient’s representative signs a declaration under oath and promptly 2submits the signed declaration to the discharging hospital and the accepting 3facility, to the corporation counsel for the county in which the incapacitated 4individual resides, to the adult-at-risk agency for the county in which the 5incapacitated individual resides, and to all of the incapacitated individual’s family 6members that can be reasonably contacted following admission of the incapacitated 7individual to a facility under this subsection. The department shall prescribe a 8form declaration for use by a patient’s representative under this subdivision. A 9declaration submitted under this subdivision shall include all of the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab598 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab598 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB598 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB598 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB598: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting